District of Columbia statutes.
34-902

Commission may adopt rules and regulations.

(a)

The Commission shall have power to adopt reasonable and proper rules and regulations relative to all inspections, tests, audits, and investigations, and to adopt and publish reasonable and proper rules to govern its proceedings and to regulate the mode and manner of all investigations and hearings of public utilities and other parties before it.

(b)

The Commission shall publish rules and regulations for the administration of § 2-534(a)(15).

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 982, ch. 150, § 8, par. 32
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-160, § 3, 61 DCR 10735
Public Service Commission, creation, powers and duties, see § 34-802.
This section is referenced in § 34-1552.
1981 Ed., § 43-602.
1973 Ed., § 43-402.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-160 designated the existing provisions as (a); and added (b).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Critical Infrastructure Freedom of Information Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-71, February 22, 2014, 61 DCR 27).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Critical Infrastructure Freedom of Information Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-229, November 29, 2013, 60 DCR 16788, 20 DCSTAT 2630).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Critical Infrastructure Freedom of Information Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-285, February 20, 2014, 61 DCR 1603).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Critical Infrastructure Freedom of Information Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-459, Oct. 24, 2014, 61 DCR 11374, 20 STAT 4364).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Critical Infrastructure Freedom of Information Third Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-580, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1264, 21 STAT 730).